New York, session 2025-2026, S602.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The social services law is amended by adding a new section 2 131-ww to read as follows: 3 § 131-ww. Shelter arrears. 1. Applicants may receive an emergency 4 grant to pay for rent, property taxes or mortgage arrears once every 5 year unless the district determines at its discretion that additional 6 shelter arrears payments are necessary based on the individual circum- 7 stances. 8 2. In an application for an allowance to pay shelter arrears, an 9 applicant shall not be required to demonstrate an ability to repay shel- 10 ter expenses, rent, property taxes, or mortgage payments going forward, 11 nor shall a district consider an applicant's ability to make payments 12 under any repayment agreement. 13 3. Unrepaid shelter expenses shall have no bearing on an applicant's 14 eligibility to receive additional loans. 15 4. The commissioner shall promulgate regulations consistent with this 16 section. 17 § 2. Section 131-w of the social services law, as added by chapter 41 18 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as follows: 19 § 131-w. Limitations in the payment of rent arrears. Districts shall 20 not provide assistance to pay rent arrears, property taxes or mortgage 21 arrears for persons not eligible for home relief, aid to dependent chil- 22 dren, emergency assistance to needy families with children or emergency 23 assistance for aged, blind and disabled persons, except to persons who 24 are without income or resources immediately available to meet the emer- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. S LBD01309-01-5 S. 602 2 1 gency need[,] and whose gross household income does not exceed [one 2 hundred twenty-five] two hundred percent of the federal income official 3 poverty line [and who sign a repayment agreement agreeing to repay the 4 assistance in a period not to exceed twelve months. The districts shall 5 enforce the repayment agreements by any legal method available to a 6 creditor, in addition to any rights it has pursuant to this chapter]. 7 The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this section 8 which shall, among other things, [establish standards for the contents 9 of repayment agreements and] establish standards to ensure that assist- 10 ance is provided only in emergency circumstances. 11 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 131-r of the social services law, as 12 added by chapter 81 of the laws of 1995 and as designated by chapter 340 13 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 14 1. Any person who is receiving or has received, within the previous 15 [ten] five years, public assistance pursuant to the provisions of this 16 article, and who wins a lottery prize of [six hundred] twenty thousand 17 dollars or more shall reimburse the department from the winnings, for 18 all such public assistance benefits paid to such person during the 19 previous [ten] five years; provided, however, that such crediting to the 20 department shall in no event exceed fifty percent of the amount of the 21 lottery prize. The commissioner shall enter into an agreement with the 22 director of the lottery, pursuant to section sixteen hundred thirteen-b 23 of the tax law, for the crediting of lottery prizes against public 24 assistance benefits. Nothing herein shall limit the ability of a social 25 services district to make recoveries pursuant to section [104] one 26 hundred four or section [106-b] one hundred six-b of this chapter. 27 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.